Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB693.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 207(g), (h) heading, introductory paragraph and (7) and (i) heading and introductory paragraph of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, are amended to read:Section 207. Requirements for kennels.* * *[(g) Additional requirements for boarding kennels, humane 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 societies or associations for the prevention of cruelty to animals and Kennel Class I through VI license holders.--The following shall apply to boarding kennels, humane societies or associations for the prevention of cruelty to animals and Kennel Class I through VI license holders:(1) Kennels under this subsection must develop and follow an appropriate plan to provide dogs with the opportunity for exercise. The plan shall be approved by a veterinarian.(2) All kennels for dogs shall be equipped with smoke alarms or fire extinguishers. Housing facilities shall be equipped with fire extinguishers on the premises. An indoor housing facility may have a sprinkler system.(3) Primary enclosures must be designed and constructed so that they are structurally sound and must be kept in good repair.(4) Primary enclosures may not have gaps or openings on the sides of the enclosure that would allow for a dog's limbs to extend into another primary enclosure.](h) Additional requirements for [Kennel Class C license holders only] primary enclosures in kennels.--The following shall apply only to primary enclosures for all dogs in [Kennel Class C] kennels:* * *(7) Housing facilities for dogs must be sufficiently ventilated at all times when dogs are present to provide for their health and well-being and to minimize odors, drafts, ammonia levels and to prevent moisture condensation. The Canine Health Board shall determine auxiliary ventilation to be provided if the ambient air temperature is 85 degrees F or 20250HB0693PN0709 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 higher. The relative humidity must be maintained at a level that [ensures the health and well-being of the dogs housed therein] accomplishes a Heat Index value of 85 or lower. The appropriate ventilation[, humidity] and ammonia ranges shall be determined by the Canine Health Board.* * *(i) Additional requirements for [Kennel Class C license holders only] kennels.--The following shall apply only to dogs over 12 weeks of age in [Kennel Class C] kennels:* * *Section 2. The provisions of 7 Pa. Code § 28a.4(a)(1) are abrogated.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0693PN0709 - 3 - 12345678910111213